Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-909
Budget; when adopted; duty of county board.

On or before September 30 of each year, the county board shall adopt the budget and appropriate the several amounts specified in the budget for the several departments, offices, activities, and funds of the county for the period to which the budget applies as provided hereinbefore.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 7, p. 227;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 5, p. 128;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2107;

R.S.1943, § 23-909;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 8, p. 216;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 30;

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB644, § 11.